District of Columbia statutes.
8-101.12

Disclosure.

A person who owns or operates an internal combustion engine as a demand response generating source shall track and submit an annual report disclosing the total number of hours, including the dates and times, that the source operated during the preceding year, and the total number of hours, including the dates and times, that the source operated as a demand response generating source during the preceding year, as well as any additional information the Director requires. The report shall be submitted to the District Department of the Environment by March 1, 2015, and annually on March 1 thereafter.

History

Sept. 9, 2014, D.C. Law 20-135, § 202, 61 DCR 6767